Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Judicial Dissolution

§ 17-16-1430.
Grounds for judicial dissolution.

The district court may dissolve a corporation:

In a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established that:

The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

In a proceeding by a shareholder if it is established that:

The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent;

The shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have failed, for a period that includes at least two (2) consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired; or

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted.

In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:

The creditor’s claim has been reduced to judgment, the execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied, and the corporation is insolvent; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor’s claim is due and owing and the corporation is insolvent.

In a proceeding by the corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision;

In a proceeding by a shareholder, if the corporation has abandoned its business and has failed within a reasonable time to liquidate and distribute its assets and dissolve.

Reserved.

Reserved.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(v).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What amounts to “oppressive” conduct under statute authorizing dissolution of corporation at suit of minority stockholders, 56 ALR3d 358.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension, 34 ALR4th 13.

§ 17-16-1431.
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

Venue for a proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a corporation lies in Laramie county district court. Venue for a proceeding brought by any other party named in W.S.

17-16-1430

lies in the county where a corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or was last located.

It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Within ten (10) days of the commencement of a proceeding under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) to dissolve a corporation that has no shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one (1) or more members of a national or affiliated securities association, the corporation must send to all shareholders, other than the petitioner, a notice stating that the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner’s shares under W.S.

17-16-1434

and accompanied by a copy of W.S.

17-16-1434

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2.

§ 17-16-1432.
Receivership or custodianship.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one (1) or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one (1) or more custodians to manage, the business and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver may:

Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

Sue and defend in his own name as receiver of the corporation in all Wyoming courts.

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its shareholders and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and his counsel from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of corporate custodian for negligence in dealing with affairs or assets of corporation, 74 ALR4th 770.

§ 17-16-1433.
Decree of dissolution.

If after a hearing the court determines that one (1) or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in W.S.

17-16-1430

exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the secretary of state, who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation’s business and affairs in accordance with W.S.

17-16-1405

and the notification of claimants in accordance with W.S.

17-16-1406

and

17-16-1407

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-1434.
Election to purchase in lieu of dissolution.

In a proceeding under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) to dissolve a corporation that has no shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one (1) or more members of a national or affiliated securities association, the corporation may elect or, if it fails to elect, one (1) or more shareholders may elect to purchase all shares owned by the petitioning shareholder at the fair value of the shares. An election pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable unless the court determines that it is equitable to set aside or modify the election.

An election to purchase pursuant to this section may be filed with the court at any time within ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) or at such later time as the court in its discretion may allow. If the election to purchase is filed by one (1) or more shareholders, the corporation shall, within ten (10) days thereafter, give written notice to all shareholders, other than the petitioner. The notice must state the name and number of shares owned by the petitioner and the name and number of shares owned by each electing shareholder and must advise the recipients of their right to join in the election to purchase shares in accordance with this section. Shareholders who wish to participate must file notice of their intention to join in the purchase no later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of the notice to them. All shareholders who have filed an election or notice of their intention to participate in the election to purchase thereby become parties to the proceeding and shall purchase in proportion to their ownership of shares as of the date the first election was filed, unless they otherwise agree or the court otherwise directs. After an election has been filed by the corporation or one (1) or more shareholders, the proceeding under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) may not be discontinued or settled, nor may the petitioning shareholder sell or otherwise dispose of his shares, unless the court determines that it would be equitable to the corporation and the shareholders, other than the petitioner, to permit such discontinuance, settlement, sale or other disposition.

If, within sixty (60) days of the filing of the first election, the parties reach agreement as to the fair value in terms of purchase of the petitioner’s shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase of petitioner’s shares upon the terms and conditions agreed to by the parties.

If the parties are unable to reach an agreement as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, the court, upon application of any party, shall stay the W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) proceedings and determine the fair value of the petitioner’s shares as of the day before the date on which the petition under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii) was filed or as of such other date as the court deems appropriate under the circumstances.

Upon determining the fair value of the shares, the court shall enter an order directing the purchase upon such terms and conditions as the court deems appropriate, which may include payment of the purchase price in installments, where necessary in the interest of equity, provision for security to assure payment of the purchase price and any additional costs, fees and expenses as may have been awarded, and, if the shares are to be purchased by the shareholders, the allocation of shares among them. In allocating petitioner’s shares among holders of different classes of shares, the court should attempt to preserve the existing distribution of voting rights among holders of different classes insofar as practicable and may direct that the holders of a specific class or classes shall not participate in the purchase. Interest may be allowed at the rate and from the date determined by the court to be equitable, but if the court finds that the refusal of the petitioning shareholder to accept an offer of payment was arbitrary or otherwise not in good faith, no interest shall be allowed. If the court finds that the petitioning shareholder had probable grounds for relief under W.S. 17-16-1430(a)(ii)(B) or (D), it may award to the petitioning shareholder reasonable fees and expenses of counsel and of any experts employed by him.

Upon entry of an order under subsection (c) or (e) of this section, the court shall dismiss the petition to dissolve the corporation under W.S.

17-16-1430

, and the petitioning shareholder shall no longer have any rights or status as a shareholder of the corporation, except the right to receive the amounts awarded to him by the order of the court which shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other judgment.

The purchase order pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall be made within ten (10) days after the date the order becomes final unless before that time the corporation files with the court a notice of its intention to adopt articles of dissolution pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1402

and

17-16-1403

, which articles must then be adopted and filed within fifty (50) days thereafter. Upon filing of such articles of dissolution, the corporation shall be dissolved in accordance with provisions of W.S.

17-16-1405

through

17-16-1407

, and the order entered pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall no longer be of any force or effect, except that the court may award the petitioning shareholder reasonable fees and expenses in accordance with the provisions of the last sentence of subsection (e) of this section and the petitioner may continue to pursue any claims previously asserted on behalf of the corporation.

Any payment by the corporation pursuant to an order under subsection (c) or (e) of this section, other than an award of fees and expenses pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, is subject to the provisions of W.S.

17-16-640

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.